Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Subchapter 6. Liens on Ships for Labor or Material

§ 2031.
Lien for labor and materials; enforcement.

A person who performs labor or furnishes materials in building, repairing, fitting, or furnishing a ship, vessel, or steamboat shall have a lien thereon for his or her wages and materials until eight months after it is completed, and may secure the same by attachment thereof.
Such attachment shall have precedence of all other attachments and claims.

§ 2032.
Prerequisites for lien.

Before such lien attaches, such person shall present a claim for his or her services performed or materials furnished and shall demand payment of the same of the owner, agent, contractor, or person in whose care such ship, vessel, or steamboat is.
Upon such demand, a payment or tender of the just amount due him or her shall discharge such lien.